Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-567
Actions; cumulative.

Nothing in sections 60-501 to 60-569 shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 67, p. 504.